Utah statutes.
59-2-924.4.   Adjustment of the calculation of the certified tax rate for
certain divided school districts.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Capital outlay increment" means the amount of revenue equal to the
difference between:
(i)  the amount of revenue generated by a levy of .0006 per dollar of taxable
value within a qualifying divided school district during a fiscal year; and
(ii)  the amount of revenue the qualifying divided school district received
during the same fiscal year from the distribution described in Section
53A-2-118.3.
(b)  "Contributing divided school district" means a school district located
within a qualifying divided school district that in a fiscal year receives
less revenue from the distribution described in Section 53A-2-118.3 than it
would have received during the same fiscal year from a levy imposed within the
school district of .0006 per dollar of taxable value.
(c)  "Divided school district" means a school district from which a new school
district is created.
(d)  "New school district" means a school district:
(i)  created under Section 53A-2-118.1;
(ii)  that begins to provide educational services after July 1, 2008; and
(iii)  located in a qualifying divided school district.
(e)  "Qualifying divided school district" means a divided school district:
(i)  located within a county of the second through sixth class; and
(ii)  with a new school district created under Section 53A-2-118.1 that begins
to provide educational services after July 1, 2008.
(f)  "Qualifying fiscal year" means the first fiscal year that a new school
district begins to provide educational services.
(g)  "Receiving divided school district" means a school district located
within a qualifying divided school district that in a fiscal year receives
more revenue from the distribution described in Section 53A-2-118.3 than it
would have received during the same fiscal year from a levy imposed within the
school district of .0006 per dollar of taxable value.
(2)  A receiving divided school district shall decrease its certified tax rate
calculated in accordance with Section 59-2-924 by the amount required to
offset the receiving divided school district's capital outlay increment for
the prior fiscal year.
(3)  Beginning with the fiscal year after the qualifying fiscal year, a
contributing divided school district is exempt from the notice and public
hearing provisions of Section 59-2-919 for the contributing divided school
district's certified tax rate calculated pursuant to Section 59-2-924 if:
(a)  the contributing divided school district budgets an increased amount of
ad valorem property tax revenue exclusive of new growth as defined in
Subsection 59-2-924(4) for the capital outlay levy required in Section
53A-2-118.3; and
(b)  the increased amount of ad valorem property tax revenue described in
Subsection (3)(a) is less than or equal to that contributing divided school
district's capital outlay increment for the prior year.
(4)  Beginning with the fiscal year after the qualifying fiscal year, a
contributing divided school district is exempt from the notice and public
hearing provisions of Section 59-2-919 for the contributing divided school
district's certified tax rate calculated pursuant to Section 59-2-924 if:
(a)  the contributing divided school district budgets an increased amount of
ad valorem property tax revenue exclusive of new growth as defined in
Subsection 59-2-924(4) for the capital outlay levy described in Section
53A-2-118.3; and
(b)  the increased amount of ad valorem property tax revenue described in
Subsection (4)(a) is less than or equal to the difference between:
(i)  the amount of revenue generated by a levy of .0006 per dollar of taxable
value imposed within the contributing divided school district during the
current taxable year; and
(ii)  the amount of revenue generated by a levy of .0006 per dollar of taxable
value imposed within the contributing divided school district during the prior
taxable year.
(5)  Regardless of the amount a school district receives from the revenue
collected from the .0006 portion of the capital outlay levy described in
Section 53A-2-118.3, the revenue generated within the school district from the
.0006 portion of the capital outlay levy described in Section 53A-2-118.3
shall be considered to be budgeted ad valorem property tax revenues of the
school district that levies the .0006 portion of the capital outlay levy for
purposes of calculating the school district's certified tax rate in accordance
with Section 59-2-924.
